District of Columbia statutes.
1-1061.13

Declaration.

A military-overseas ballot must include or be accompanied by a declaration signed by the voter that a material misstatement of fact in completing the ballot may be grounds for a conviction of making a false statement under the laws of the District.

June 5, 2012, D.C. Law 19-137, § 113, 59 DCR 2542
This section is referenced in § 1-1061.17 and § 22-2405.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 13 of the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act.